Florida, session 2026, SB846.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 19 20 Section 1.âSection 790.402, Florida Statutes, is created to 21 read: 22 790.402âReporting of lost or stolen firearms.â 23 (1)âAn individual who owns or lawfully possesses a firearm 24 must report the loss or theft of the firearm to the local law 25 enforcement agency in the jurisdiction in which the loss or 26 theft occurred within 48 hours after the time that he or she 27 knew or reasonably should have known that the firearm had been 28 lost or stolen and provide to the local law enforcement agency 29 the make, model, caliber, and serial number, if known, of the 30 firearm and the date, time, place, and circumstances surrounding 31 the last time the individual saw the firearm. 32 (2)âNotwithstanding any other law, upon receiving a report 33 of a lost or stolen firearm, the local law enforcement agency 34 shall create an incident report and, upon request of the 35 reporting individual, provide a copy of the report to the 36 individual at no cost. 37 (3)âAn individual who has reported a firearm lost or stolen 38 under subsection (1) and who subsequently recovers the firearm 39 shall notify the local law enforcement agency to which the loss 40 or theft was reported within 48 hours after the recovery. 41 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.